Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 5060, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5060. A. Where practicable and in accordance with
state and federal law, the state Medicaid program shall not contract
with an out-of-state medical provider for treatment that is
available from one or more providers licensed and practicing in the
State of Oklahoma. For the purposes of this section, "treatment"
shall refer to services that require the physical presence of the
patient and the direct care of a medical provider. Services that
are conducted remotely, including laboratory analysis or diagnostic
processing, shall not be considered treatment under this section.
B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall seek any federal
approval necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1816 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
April 14, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1816 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)